Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska23-35,116
Hospital authority; powers; supplemental to other laws; bonds.

The Hospital Authorities Act shall be deemed to provide a complete, additional, and alternative method for the doing of the things authorized thereby and shall be regarded as supplemental and additional to powers conferred by other laws, except that the issuance of bonds and refunding bonds under the act need not comply with the requirements of any other law applicable to the issuance of bonds, including, but not limited to, Chapter 10, and the bonds shall not be required to be registered in the office of any county clerk or treasurer, comptroller, or finance director of any city or village. The bonds shall constitute exempt securities within the meaning of section 8-1110. Except as otherwise expressly provided in the Hospital Authorities Act, none of the powers granted to an authority under the act shall be subject to the supervision or regulation or require the approval or consent of any municipality or political subdivision or any commission, court, board, body, bureau, official, or agency thereof or of the state.

Laws 1971, LB 54, § 43;

R.S.1943, (1987), § 23-343.116;

Laws 2001, LB 420, § 23.